Rhode Island, session 2025, SB797.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 34-37.1-3 and 34-37.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-37.1
entitled "Homeless Bill of Rights" are hereby amended to read as follows:
34-37.1-3. Bill of Rights.
No person’s rights, privileges, or access to public services may be denied or abridged solely
because he or she is homeless. Such a person shall be granted the same rights and privileges as any
other resident of this state. A person experiencing homelessness:
(1) Has the right to use and move freely in public spaces, including, but not limited to,
public sidewalks, public parks, public transportation and public buildings, in the same manner as
any other person, and without discrimination on the basis of his or her housing status;
(2) Has the right to equal treatment by all state and municipal agencies, without
discrimination on the basis of housing status;
(3) Has the right not to face discrimination while seeking or maintaining employment due
to his or her lack of permanent mailing address, or his or her mailing address being that of a shelter
or social service provider;
(4) Has the right to emergency medical care free from discrimination based on his or her
housing status;
(5) Has the right to live in clean and sanitary conditions, including having access to trash
receptacles and toilet facilities (portable or permanent);
(6) Has the right to collaborate with outreach and available social workers;

(5)(7) Has the right to vote, register to vote, and receive documentation necessary to prove
identity for voting without discrimination due to his or her housing status;
(6)(8) Has the right to protection from disclosure of his or her records and information
provided to homeless shelters and service providers to state, municipal and private entities without
appropriate legal authority; and the right to confidentiality of personal records and information in
accordance with all limitations on disclosure established by the Federal Homeless Management
Information Systems, the Federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, and the
Federal Violence Against Women Act; and
(7)(9) Has the right to a reasonable expectation of privacy in his or her personal property
to the same extent as personal property in a permanent residence.
34-37.1-4. Damages and attorney’s fees Damages, attorney's fees and fines.
(a) In any civil action alleging a violation of this chapter, the court may award appropriate
injunctive and declaratory relief, actual damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a
prevailing plaintiff.
(b) An aggrieved individual or organization, that is charted for the purpose of safeguarding
individual civil liberties or combatting homelessness, shall have the right to bring a civil action in
the superior court to enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(c) Any person intentionally violating any right recognized in this chapter shall be fined
five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.
(d) All fines collected shall be utilized for housing stabilization services or to address other
issues related to homelessness.
SECTION 2. Chapter 34-37.1 of the General Laws entitled "Homeless Bill of Rights" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
34-37.1-7. Written policies required.
(a) All police and public works departments shall adopt written policies and procedures
necessary to ensure that their respective departments fully comply with all requirements of this
chapter.
(b) Every police department policy established pursuant to the provisions of this section
shall recognize the reasonable expectation of privacy that a homeless person has in their tent.
Pursuant to the policy, no tent occupied by a homeless person shall be subject to an unreasonable
search.
34-37.1-8. Encampments.
(a) Prior to any enforcement action to relocate or vacate persons occupying an encampment
located on public property, at least sixty (60) days notice to vacate shall be provided to persons
LC001787 - Page 2 of 4

staying in the encampment.
(b) Reasonable alternatives for relocation shall be made available to all person occupying
the encampment in collaboration with outreach and other available social workers, prior to any
enforcement action conducted pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001787
========
LC001787 - Page 3 of 4